District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.71

Establishment of Greater Southeast Community Hospital Capital Equipment Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Greater Southeast Community Hospital Capital Equipment Fund (“Fund), the funds of which shall be used by the Mayor for the sole purpose of purchasing and maintaining capital equipment at Greater Southeast Community Hospital.

(b)

(1)

If the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia certifies, through a revised quarterly revenue estimate for fiscal year 2008, that local funds exceed the annual revenue estimates incorporated in the approved fiscal year 2008 budget and financial plan, any allocation of those additional revenues shall include a deposit into the Fund of an amount equal to the revenue generated by taxes and assessments of the properties in the District of Columbia described as Lots 3 and 4, Square 5919.

(2)

The Fund may also receive monies from appropriations, federal grants, and revenues from any other source.

(3)

All funds deposited into the Fund shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (a) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

(c)

The Mayor shall conduct an annual audit of all income and expenditures of the Fund and provide the annual report to the Council.

History

Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 1072, 54 DCR 7052

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1072 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).

Short Title

Short title: Section 1071 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle H of title I of the act may be cited as the “Greater Southeast Community Hospital Capital Equipment Fund Establishment Act of 2007”.